Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5882.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-10-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10 entitled "Operators’
and Chauffeurs’ Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10-5. Special restrictions for drivers for compensation.
(a) No person who is under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall drive any school bus
transporting school children or any motor vehicle when in use for the transportation of persons or
property for compensation nor in either event until he or she has been licensed as a chauffeur for
either purpose and the license so indicates. Colleges and universities shall be exempt from the
requirement for a public plate for vehicles used to shuttle only students or employees to various
points within the college or university campus or if a college or university owned or leased vehicle
is used for the occasional transportation of college or university employees or students either on or
off campus provided that the vehicle is operated by a college or university employee possessing a
valid Rhode Island chauffeur’s license or a commercial drivers license with a passenger
endorsement. Provided, however, that the college or university shall operate the shuttle service and
there shall be no specific charge for the transportation of students or employees. The division of
motor vehicles shall not issue a chauffeur’s license for either purpose unless the applicant has had
at least one year of driving experience prior to the application, and has filed with the division of
motor vehicles one or more certificates signed by a total of at least three (3) responsible people to
whom he or she is well known certifying to the applicant’s good character and habits and the

administrator of the division of motor vehicles is fully satisfied as to the applicant’s competency
and fitness to be so employed.
(b) In addition to the requirements provided in subsection (a) of this section, any person
(hereinafter sometimes referred to as an "applicant") attempting to obtain a chauffeur’s license to
drive a school bus transporting school children shall, prior to being certified:
(1) Successfully complete a ten (10) hour school bus driver training course conducted by
the department of revenue or the department of revenue’s designee and file a certificate of
successful completion with the division of motor vehicles. The curriculum of that course and the
accreditation of courses offered shall be pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the
division of motor vehicles. Provided, for an applicant who holds a valid commercial driver’s
license, the course shall be abbreviated and reduced in time and shall focus on the specific Rhode
Island requirements for school bus drivers;
(2) Pass a written examination prepared and given by the department of revenue or the
department of revenue’s designee.
(3) Pass a driving test in a school bus of a like type which that person will be employed to
drive. The test will be prepared and given by the department of revenue.
(c) Prior to issuing a certificate to any person who intends to drive a school bus, the division
of motor vehicles shall conduct a search of that person’s motor vehicle record. Any violation of
any safety regulation or conviction of any motor vehicle law in this or any other state shall be
grounds for refusing to issue a certificate.
31-10-5.1. School bus driver annual training.
(a) The department of revenue shall promulgate any rules and regulations that it deems
necessary to ensure that a ten-hour (10) training course is provided for all new school bus drivers
(hereinafter sometimes referred to as an "applicant") and a three-hour (3) retraining course is
provided to all renewal applicants on at least a yearly basis. Provided, that for an applicant who
holds a valid commercial driver’s license, the ten (10) hour training course shall be abbreviated and
reduced in time and shall focus on the specific Rhode Island requirements for school bus drivers.
(b) The training shall include, but not be limited to, defensive driving, the National
Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s School Bus Driver In-Service Series, and instruction in
all state laws, rules, and regulations relating to school buses and school bus safety.
(c) Prior to any renewal of any certificate of a school bus driver, the division of motor
vehicles shall require proof of the renewal applicant’s having successfully completed the annual
retraining as provided in this section. Every ten (10) years that proof shall include the passing of a
written examination prepared by the department of revenue, or the department of revenue’s
LC000922/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

designee, and conducted by employees of the department.
SECTION 2. Chapter 31-10 of the General Laws entitled "Operators’ and Chauffeurs’
Licenses" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-10-5.2. Temporary school bus driver license for out-of-state holders of commercial
driver’s license.
(a) A person who is a resident of a state which borders Rhode Island, and which person
possesses a valid commercial driver’s license and a license to operate a school bus in the person's
state of residence, may apply for a temporary school bus certificate or pupil transportation
certificate (hereinafter sometimes referred to as a “temporary school bus driver license”) in Rhode
Island, as follows:
(1) The person is a resident of the border state;
(2) The person brings to any branch of the division of motor vehicles (the “division”) an
original or certified copy of the following documents which pertain to the person:
(i) A current valid school bus driver physical;
(ii) A valid in-force commercial driver’s license;
(iii) A valid in-force school bus operator license from the state wherein they are a resident;
(iv) Proof of residency in the bordering state;
(v) Proof of United States’ citizenship or lawful permanent residency;
(vi) A social security card; and
(vii) A letter from a local school bus provider, contractor, or school district, indicating that
the person will be employed as a school bus driver by the issuer of the letter if the person obtains
their temporary school bus driver license pursuant to this section.
(3) In the event the person brings in the documents listed in this subsection, the division of
motor vehicles shall review the documents. If the division determines the documents appear to be
in order, the division may issue to the person a temporary school bus driver license under this
section. In reviewing the documents, for purposes of this section, the division need only verify that
the documents on their face appear valid; provided that, the division may refuse to issue the
temporary school bus driver license if the division finds irregularities in the documents or has other
reason to believe the temporary school bus driver license should not be issued to the applicant.
(b)(1) A temporary school bus driver license issued pursuant to this section shall be valid
for and expire one hundred twenty (120) days after its date of issuance.
(2) Within that one hundred twenty day (120) period, the person may undertake the ten
(10) hour training course provided for in §§ 31-10-5 and 31-10-5.1. If the person undertakes and
completes the training course, and submits proof of such completion to the division of motor
LC000922/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

vehicles before expiration of the temporary school bus driver license, and provided the person
otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter, the person shall be issued a full school bus
certificate or pupil transportation certificate, and shall be subject to the same rules and conditions
as any holder of such a license or certificate.
(3) If a person operating under a temporary school bus certificate or pupil transportation
certificate does not either complete the training required or fails to submit proof of their training as
provided under this chapter, within the one hundred twenty (120) day period, the person’s
temporary school bus driver license shall immediately be cancelled. The division of motor vehicles
shall mail that person a written cancellation notice of their Rhode Island temporary school bus
driver license.
(c) Temporary school bus driver licenses issued under this section shall not be used to
influence or interfere with active labor disputes, including, but not limited to, strikes or work
stoppages.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000922/SUB A
========
LC000922/SUB A - Page 4 of 5